nl: Cupcake maat: Jumbo; Groot; Mini; Klein; Standaard; Overig
en: Cupcake size: Jumbo; Large; Mini; Small; Standard; Other
pt-BR: Tamanho do cupcake: Jumbo; Grande; Mini; Pequeno; Padrão; Outro
ja: カップケーキサイズ: ジャンボ; ラージ; ミニ; スモール; スタンダード; その他
fi: Kuppikakun koko: Jumbo; Suuri; Mini; Pieni; Vakio; Muu
hr-HR: Veličina kolačića: Jumbo; Veliki; Mini; Mali; Standardni; Ostalo
ro-RO: Dimensiunea brioșei: Jumbo; Mare; Mini; Mic; Standard; Altele
sl-SI: Velikost kolačka: Zelo velika; Velika; Mini; Majhna; Standardna; Drugo
sk-SK: Veľkosť koláčika: Jumbo; Veľká; Mini; Malá; Štandardná; Iné
vi: Kích thước bánh cupcake: Khổng lồ; Lớn; Mini; Nhỏ; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
hu: Cupcake mérete: Jumbo; Nagy; Mini; Kicsi; Normál; Egyéb
nb: Cupcake-størrelse: Jumbo; Stor; Mini; Liten; Standard; Annet
zh-TW: 杯子蛋糕尺寸: 特大; 大; 迷你; 小; 標準; 其他
bg-BG: Размер на мъфин: Джъмбо; Голям; Мини; Малък; Стандартен; Други
fr: Taille du cupcake: Géant; Grand; Mini; Petit; Standard; Autre
da: Cupcake-størrelse: Jumbo; Stor; Mini; Lille; Standard; Andet
zh-CN: 纸杯蛋糕尺寸: 特大; 大号; 迷你; 小号; 标准; 其他
ko: 컵케이크 사이즈: 점보; 라지; 미니; 스몰; 표준; 기타
tr: Cupcake boyutu: Jumbo; Büyük; Mini; Küçük; Standart; Diğer
sv: Cupcake-storlek: Jumbo; Stor; Mini; Liten; Standard; Övrigt
it: Cupcake o: Jumbo; Grande; Mini; Piccolo; Standard; Altro
el: Μέγεθος καπ-κέικ: Γίγας; Μεγάλο; Μίνι; Μικρό; Κανονικό; Άλλο
lt-LT: Keksiuko dydis: Milžiniškas; Didelis; Mini; Mažas; Standartinis; Kita
th: ขนาดคัพเค้ก: จัมโบ้; ใหญ่; มินิ; เล็ก; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
pl: Rozmiar babeczki: Jumbo; Duża; Miniaturowa; Mała; Standardowa; Inna
ru: Размер капкейка: Джамбо; Большой; Мини; Маленький; Стандартный; Другое
pt-PT: Tamanho do queque: Jumbo; Grande; Mini; Pequeno; Padrão; Outro
cs: Velikost košíčku na cupcake: Obří; Velká; Mini; Malá; Standardní; Ostatní
de: Cupcake-Größe: Jumbo; Groß; Mini; Klein; Standard; Sonstige
es: Tamaño de cupcake: Jumbo; Grande; Mini; Pequeño; Estándar; Otro